Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-488
Privileges conferred
by license; game birds, requirements; marking and
transport.

The licensee of any licensed game breeding
and controlled shooting area may take or authorize to be taken, within the
season fixed and designated and in such numbers as provided in sections 37-484
to 37-496, game birds as specified in rules and regulations of the commission
and released on licensed areas during the shooting season as provided in such
sections. The commission shall
prescribe requirements, in rules and regulations, for the marking and transport
of the game birds released.

Laws 1957, c. 152, § 5, p. 493;

Laws 1974, LB 766, § 1;

Laws 1985, LB 446, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 30;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-905;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 198;

Laws 2011, LB41, § 19.